Utah statutes.
77-10a-17.   Grand jury report on noncriminal misconduct -- Action on the
report.
(1)  A grand jury may upon completion of its original term or each extension,
with the concurrence of a majority of its members, submit to the managing
judge a report concerning noncriminal misconduct, malfeasance, or misfeasance
in office as a basis for a recommendation of removal or disciplinary action
against a public officer or employee.
(2)  The judge to whom the report is submitted shall examine it and the
minutes of the grand jury.  The judge shall make an order accepting and filing
the report as a public record, but only if the judge is satisfied that it
complies with Subsection (1) and:
(a)  the report is based on facts revealed during the grand jury's
investigation and is supported by a preponderance of evidence; and
(b)  each person named and any reasonable number of witnesses on his behalf as
designated by him to the foreman of the grand jury were afforded an
opportunity to testify before the grand jury prior to the filing of the
report.
(3)  An order accepting a report made under this section and the report itself
shall be sealed by the managing judge and may not be filed as a public record
or be subject to subpoena or otherwise made public until:
(a)  at least 31 days after a copy of the order and report are served on each
public officer or employee named and an answer has been filed;
(b)  the time for filing an answer has expired; or
(c)  an appeal is taken or until all rights of review of the public officer or
employee named have expired or terminated in an order accepting the report.
(4) (a)  An order accepting the report may not be entered until 30 days after
the delivery of the report to the public officer or body having jurisdiction,
responsibility, or authority over each public officer or employee named in the
report.
(b)  The managing judge may issue orders it finds necessary and appropriate to
prevent unauthorized publication of a report.  Unauthorized publication of a
report may be punished as contempt of court.
(5) (a)  A public officer or employee named in a report may file with the
clerk a verified answer to the report not later than 20 days after service of
the order and report upon him.  Upon a showing of good cause, the managing
judge may grant the public officer or employee an extension of time to file an
answer and may authorize limited publication of the report as necessary to
prepare an answer.
(b)  The answer shall plainly and concisely state the facts and law
constituting the defense of the public officer or employee to the charges in
the report.  Except for those parts the managing judge determines have been
inserted scandalously, prejudiciously, or unnecessarily, the answer becomes an
appendix to the report.
(6)  Upon the submission of a report made under this section the managing
judge shall order the report sealed if he finds the filing of the report as a
public record may prejudice fair consideration of a pending criminal matter.
The report may not be subject to subpoena or public inspection during the
pendency of the criminal matter except upon order of the managing judge.
(7) (a)  When the managing judge to whom a report is submitted is not
satisfied that the report complies with the provisions of this section, he may
direct that additional testimony be taken before the same grand jury or he
shall make an order sealing the report.
(b)  If the report is sealed, it may not be filed as a public record or be
subject to subpoena or otherwise made public until the provisions of this
section are met.
(8)  A grand jury's term may be extended by the managing judge so additional
testimony may be taken or the provisions of this section met.
